Hawaii statutes.
§142-95 Rabbits, Belgian hares, to be kept
off ground; penalty. Any person who breeds, raises or keeps rabbits or
Belgian hares shall keep them off the ground.

Any person who violates this section shall be
fined not more than $100 or imprisoned not more than six months, or both. [L
1957, c 298, §§1, 2; Supp, §20-94; HRS §142-95]

Cross References

Classification of
offense and authorized punishment, see §§701-107, 706-640, 663.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next